hu: Pellet tartozék típusa: Gyűrűző; Gyűrűző fogó; Adagoló; Fúró; Hajszálelőke-hosszabbító; Tartó; Tű; Húzó; Ütköző; Egyéb
nl: Type pelletaccessoire: Bander; Banding tool; Dispenser; Boor; Hair extender; Houder; Naald; Trekker; Stopper; Overig
vi: Loại phụ kiện cho súng hơi viên chì: Dụng cụ gắn dây chun; Dụng cụ buộc; Dụng cụ phân phát; Mũi khoan; Phụ kiện nối cước tàng hình; Giá đỡ; Kim; Dụng cụ kéo; Nút chặn; Khác
de: Pellet-Zubehör: Pellet-Bander; Banding-Werkzeug; Spender; Bohrer; Haar-Verlängerung; Halter; Nadel; Puller; Stopper; Sonstige
hr-HR: Vrsta dodatka za pelete: Alat za postavljanje gumica; Alat za prstenovanje; Dozator; Bušilica; Produživač za kosu; Držač; Igla; Izvlakač; Stoper; Ostalo
lt-LT: Peletės priedo tipas: Juostuotojas; Juostavimo įrankis; Dozatorius; Grąžtas; Plauko ilgintuvas; Laikiklis; Adata; Traukiklis; Stabdiklis; Kita
en: Pellet accessory type: Bander; Banding tool; Dispenser; Drill; Hair extender; Holder; Needle; Puller; Stop; Other
sk-SK: Typ príslušenstva na pelety: Páskovač; Páskovací nástroj; Dávkovač; Vrták; Nástroj na predlžovanie vlasov; Držiak; Ihla; Sťahovák; Zarážka; Iné
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเหยื่อเม็ด: เครื่องรัด; เครื่องมือรัด; อุปกรณ์จ่าย; ที่เจาะ; สายต่อเหยื่อ; ที่จับ; เข็ม; ตัวดึง; สต็อปเปอร์; อื่นๆ
ja: ペレットアクセサリータイプ: バンダー; バンディングツール; ディスペンサー; ドリル; ヘアエクステンダー; ホルダー; ニードル; プラー; ストップ; その他
pl: Typ akcesorium z granulatu: Nakładacz gumek (bander); Narzędzie do zakładania gumek; Dozownik; Wiertło; Przedłużka włosa (hair extender); Uchwyt; Igła; Zaciągacz; Stoper; Inne
zh-CN: 饵料颗粒配件类型: 绑带器; 绑带工具; 分配器; 钻头; 游动线延长器; 固定器; 穿饵针; 拉线器; 挡珠; 其他
cs: Typ příslušenství pro pelety: Páskovač; Páskovací nástroj; Dávkovač; Vrtáček; Prodlužovač vlasového návazce; Držák; Jehla; Utahovač; Zarážka; Ostatní
da: Tilbehørstype til pellets: Elastiktang; Elastikværktøj; Dispenser; Bor; Hair extender; Holder; Nål; Puller; Stopper; Andet
pt-BR: Pelota, tipo de acessório: Aplicador de elástico; Ferramenta para elástico; Dispenser; Broca; Extensor de hair rig; Suporte; Agulha; Puxador; Trava; Outro
es: Tipo de accesorio para pellets: Anillador; Herramienta de anillado; Dispensador; Taladro; Extensor de hair rig; Soporte; Aguja; Tirador; Tope; Otro
sv: Typ av tillbehör för pellets: Pelletbandare; Bandningsverktyg; Dispenser; Borr; Hårförlängare; Hållare; Nål; Dragare; Stoppare; Övrigt
fi: Pellettilisävarusteen tyyppi: Rengastaja; Rengastustyökalu; Annostelija; Pora; Hiusrigin pidennin; Pidike; Neula; Vetotyökalu; Pysäytin; Muu
zh-TW: 顆粒狀配件類型: 套餌器; 綁餌工具; 分配器; 鑽孔器; 釣組延長線; 固定器; 穿餌針; 拉餌器; 擋珠; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de accesoriu pentru peleți: Aplicator benzi; Instrument pentru benzi; Dozator; Burghiu; Extensie fir de păr; Suport; Ac; Extractor; Opritor; Altele
it: Tipo di accessorio per pellet: Pinza per anelli elastici; Attrezzo per anelli; Dispenser; Trapanino; Estensore per hair rig; Supporto; Ago; Estrattore; Stopper; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta dodatka za pelete: Nameščevalec obročkov; Orodje za obročke; Dozirnik; Sveder; Podaljšek za las; Držalo; Igla; Zategovalec; Štoper; Drugo
el: Τύπος αξεσουάρ σφαιριδίων: Λαστιχάκι; Εργαλείο τοποθέτησης ταινίας/ελαστικού; Διανομέας; Τρυπάνι; Επέκταση hair rig; Βάση; Βελόνα; Εξολκέας; Στοπ; Άλλο
ru: Тип аксессуара для пеллетса: Пучковяз (бандер); Инструмент для бандажирования; Дозатор; Сверло; Удлинитель волоса; Держатель; Игла; Затягиватель (пуллер); Стопор; Другое
nb: Type pelletstilbehør: Bander; Båndverktøy; Dispenser; Bor; Hair-forlenger; Holder; Nål; Trekkverktøy; Stopper; Annet
bg-BG: Тип аксесоар за пелети: Инструмент за поставяне на ластици; Инструмент за връзване; Диспенсър; Свредло; Удължител за косъм; Държач; Игла; Издърпвач; Стопер; Друг
tr: Pelet aksesuar türü: Bantlayıcı; Bantlama aleti; Dağıtıcı; Matkap; Köstek uzatıcı; Tutucu; İğne; Çekici; Stoper; Diğer
ko: 펠릿 액세서리 유형: 밴더; 밴딩 툴; 디스펜서; 드릴; 헤어 익스텐더; 홀더; 니들; 풀러; 스토퍼; 기타
fr: Type d'accessoire pour granulés: Pince à pellets; Outil de baguage; Distributeur; Foret; Extension de cheveu; Support; Aiguille; Extracteur; Stop-appât; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de acessório para chumbadas: Alicate para anilhas; Ferramenta de anilhagem; Dispensador; Broca; Extensor de cabelo; Suporte; Agulha; Extrator; Batente; Outro